District of Columbia statutes.
47-857.09

Tax abatements for new residential developments — Abatement caps.

(a)

The Mayor may approve up to $2.5 million in annual tax abatements under §§ 47-857.03 and 47-857.05; provided, the Mayor may approve only up to $500,000 in annual tax abatements in fiscal year 2003.

(b)

The Mayor may approve up to $2 million in annual tax abatements under §§ 47-857.04 and 47-857.06.

(c)

The Mayor may approve up to $3.5 million in annual tax abatements under §§ 47-857.07 and 47-857.08; provided, that $500,000 shall be reserved for properties in eligible area #4.

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 601(b), 49 DCR 1468
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1103(a), 49 DCR 6968
Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-226, § 2(d), 53 DCR 10238
This section is referenced in § 47-857.02, § 47-857.06, and § 47-857.07.
D.C. Law 14-190, in subsec. (a), substituted “and 47-857.05; provided, the Mayor may approve only up to $500,000 in annual tax abatements in fiscal year 2003.” for “and 47-857.05.”
D.C. Law 16-226, in subsec. (c), increased the annual tax abatement approval cap from $2.5 million to $3.5 million.
Section 2(d) of D.C. Law 16-201 amended subsec. (c) to read as follows:
“(c) The Mayor may approve up to $3.5 million in annual tax abatements under §§ 47-857.07 and 47-857.08; provided that $500,000 of such money shall be reserved for properties in eligible area #4.”
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 16-201 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1103 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Square 2910 Residential Development Stimulus Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-471, July 31, 2006, 53 DCR 6778).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Square 2910 Residential Development Stimulus Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-521, October 27, 2006, 53 DCR 9117).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Square 2910 Residential Development Stimulus Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-669, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1146).
Section 1103(b) of D.C. Law 14-190 provided: “Funds sufficient for the implementation of this section shall be transferred from the Housing Production Trust Fund to the General Fund.”